Utah statutes.
41-6a-1509.   Street-legal all-terrain vehicle -- Operation on highways -- Registration and licensing requirements -- Equipment requirements.

(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (1)(b), an all-terrain type I or utility type vehicle that meets the requirements of this section may be operated as a street-legal ATV on a street or highway unless the highway is an interstate freeway or a limited access highway as defined in Section 41-6a-102.

(b)  Unless a street or highway is designated as open for street-legal ATV use by the controlling highway authority in accordance with Section 41-22-10.5, a person may not operate a street-legal ATV on a street or highway in accordance with Subsection (1)(a) if the highway is under the jurisdiction of:

(i)  a county of the first class;

(ii)  a municipality that is within a county of the first class; or

(iii)  a municipality with a population of 7,500 or more people.

(2)  A street-legal ATV shall comply with the same requirements as:

(a)  a motorcycle for:

(i)  traffic rules under Title 41, Chapter 6a, Traffic Code;

(ii)  registration, titling, odometer statement, vehicle identification, license plates, and registration fees under Title 41, Chapter 1a, Motor Vehicle Act;

(iii)  fees in lieu of property taxes or in lieu fees under Section 59-2-405.2; and

(iv)  the county motor vehicle emissions inspection and maintenance programs under Section 41-6a-1642;

(b)  a motor vehicle for:

(i)  driver licensing under Title 53, Chapter 3, Uniform Driver License Act;

(ii)  motor vehicle insurance under Title 41, Chapter 12a, Financial Responsibility of Motor Vehicle Owners and Operators Act; and

(iii)  safety inspection requirements under Title 53, Chapter 8, Part 2, Motor Vehicle Safety Inspection Act, except that a street-legal ATV shall be subject to a safety inspection when registered for the first time; and

(c)  an all-terrain type I or type II vehicle for off-highway vehicle provisions under Title 41, Chapter 22, Off-Highway Vehicles, and Title 41, Chapter 3, Motor Vehicle Business Regulation Act, unless otherwise specified in this section.

(3)  A street-legal ATV shall be equipped with:

(a)  one or more headlamps that meet the requirements of Section 41-6a-1603;

(b)  one or more tail lamps;

(c)  a tail lamp or other lamp constructed and placed to illuminate the registration plate with a white light;

(d)  one or more red reflectors on the rear;

(e)  one or more stop lamps on the rear;

(f)  amber or red electric turn signals, one on each side of the front and rear;

(g)  a braking system, other than a parking brake, that meets the requirements of Section 41-6a-1623;

(h)  a horn or other warning device that meets the requirements of Section 41-6a-1625;

(i)  a muffler and emission control system that meets the requirements of Section 41-6a-1626;

(j)  rearview mirrors on the right and left side of the driver in accordance with Section 41-6a-1627;

(k)  a windshield, unless the operator wears eye protection while operating the vehicle;

(l)  a speedometer, illuminated for nighttime operation;

(m)  for vehicles designed by the manufacturer for carrying one or more passengers, a seat designed for passengers, including a footrest and handhold for each passenger;

(n)  for vehicles with side-by-side seating, seatbelts for each vehicle occupant; and

(o)  tires that:

(i)  do not exceed 26 inches in height;

(ii)  are not larger than the tires that the all-terrain vehicle manufacturer made available for the all-terrain vehicle model; and

(iii)  have at least 2/32 inches or greater tire tread.

(4) (a)  Subject to the requirement in Subsection (4)(b), an operator of a street-legal all-terrain vehicle, when operating a street-legal all-terrain vehicle on a highway in accordance with this section, may not exceed the lesser of:

(i)  the posted speed limit; or

(ii)  45 miles per hour.

(b)  An operator of a street-legal all-terrain vehicle, when operating a street-legal all-terrain vehicle on a highway with a posted speed limit higher than 45 miles per hour, shall:

(i)  operate the street-legal all-terrain vehicle on the extreme right hand side of the roadway; and

(ii)  shall equip the street-legal all-terrain vehicle with a reflector or reflective tape.

(5) (a)  A nonresident operator of an off-highway vehicle that is authorized to be operated on the highways of another state has the same rights and privileges as a street-legal ATV that is granted operating privileges on the highways of this state, subject to the restrictions under this section and rules made by the Board of Parks and Recreation, if the other state offers reciprocal operating privileges to Utah residents.

(b)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the Board of Parks and Recreation shall establish eligibility requirements for reciprocal operating privileges for nonresident users granted under Subsection (5)(a).

(6)  Nothing in this chapter shall restrict the operation of an off-highway vehicle in accordance with Section 41-22-10.5.



Amended by Chapter 308, 2010 General Session

